Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 238.005 is amended to read:
238.005. For purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active member” means a member who is presently employed by a participating public em-
ployer in a qualifying position and who has completed the  six-month period of service required by
ORS 238.015.
(2) “Annuity” means payments for life derived  from contributions made by a member as provided
in this chapter.
(3) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(4) “Calendar year” means  12 calendar months commencing on January 1 and ending on De-
cember 31 following.
(5) “Continuous service” means service not interrupted for more than five years,  except that
such continuous service shall be computed without regard to interruptions in the case of:
(a) An employee who had returned to the service  of the employer as of January 1, 1945, and
who remained in that employment until having  established membership in the Public Employees
Retirement System.
(b) An employee who was  in the armed services on January 1, 1945, and returned to the service
of the employer  within one year of the date of being otherwise than dishonorably discharged and
remained in that employment until having established membership in the  Public Employees Retire-
ment System.
(6) “Creditable service” means any period of time during which an active member is being paid
a salary by a participating public employer and  for which benefits under this chapter are funded by
employer contributions and earnings on the fund. For purposes of computing  years of “creditable
service,” full months and major fractions of a month shall be considered  to be one-twelfth of a year
and shall be added to all full years. “Creditable service” includes all retirement  credit received by
a member.
(7) “Earliest service retirement age” means the age attained by a member when  the member
could first make application for retirement under the provisions of ORS 238.280.
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 1
(8) “Employee”  means a person who performs services for a participating public employer, in-
cluding persons considered employees of a participating public employer under 26  U.S.C. 3121(d)(2),
as in effect on December 31, 2019, and public officers. “Employee” does not include:
(a) Persons engaged as independent contractors.
(b) Seasonal, emergency or casual workers whose periods of employment with  any public em-
ployer or public employers do not total 600 hours in any calendar year.
(c) Persons provided  sheltered employment or made-work by a public employer in an employment
or industries program maintained for the benefit of such persons.
(d) Persons employed and paid from federal funds received under a  federal program intended
primarily to alleviate unemployment. However, any such person shall be  considered an “employee”
if not otherwise excluded by paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection and the  public employer elects
to have the person so considered by an irrevocable written notice to the board.
(e) Persons who are employees of a  railroad, as defined in ORS 824.020, and who, as such em-
ployees, are included in a retirement plan  under federal railroad retirement statutes. This paragraph
shall be deemed to have been in effect since the inception of the system.
(f) Persons employed in positions classified  as post-doctoral scholar positions by a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or by the Oregon Health and Science University, under ORS 350.370.
(9) “Final average salary” means whichever of the following is greater:
(a) The average salary per calendar year paid by one  or more participating public employers to
an employee who is  an active member of the system in three of the calendar years of membership
before the effective date of retirement of the  employee, in which three years the employee was paid
the highest salary. The three calendar years in which  the employee was paid the largest total salary
may include calendar years in which the employee was employed for less than a full  calendar year.
If the number of calendar years of active membership before the effective date  of retirement of the
employee is three or fewer, the final average salary for the employee is the average salary  per
calendar year paid by one or more participating public employers to the employee in all  of those
years, without regard to whether the employee was employed for the full calendar year.
(b) One-third of the total salary paid by  a participating public employer to an employee who is
an active member of the system in the last 36 calendar months  of active membership before the ef-
fective date of retirement of the employee.
(10) “Firefighter” does not include a volunteer firefighter, but does include:
(a) The State Fire Marshal, the chief deputy fire marshal and deputy state fire marshals;
(b) An employee of the State  Fire Marshal whose primary duties include fire investigation, fire
prevention, fire safety, fire control or fire suppression;
(c) An employee of the State Forestry  Department who is certified by the State Forester as a
professional wildland firefighter and whose primary duties  include the abatement of uncontrolled
fires as described in ORS 477.064; and
(d) An employee of the Oregon Military Department whose primary duties include  fighting
structural, aircraft, wildland or other fires.
(11) “Fiscal year” means 12 calendar  months commencing on July 1 and ending on June 30 fol-
lowing.
(12) “Fund” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(13) “Inactive member” means a member who  is not employed in a qualifying position, whose
membership has not been terminated in the manner described by  ORS 238.095 and who is not retired
for service or disability.
(14) “Institution of higher education”  means a public university listed in ORS 352.002, the
Oregon Health and Science University and a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(15) “Member” means a person who has established membership in the  system and whose mem-
bership has not been terminated as  described in ORS 238.095. “Member” includes active, inactive
and retired members.
(16) “Member account” means the regular account and the variable account.
(17) “Normal retirement age” means:
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 2
(a) For a person who establishes  membership in the system before January 1, 1996, as described
in ORS 238.430, 55 years of age if the employee retires at that age as a police officer  or firefighter
or 58 years of age if the employee retires at that age as other than a police officer or firefighter.
(b) For a person who establishes membership in the system on or after January 1, 1996,  as de-
scribed in ORS 238.430, 55 years of age if the employee retires at  that age as a police officer or
firefighter or 60 years of age if the employee retires at that age as other  than a police officer or
firefighter.
(18) “Pension”  means annual payments for life derived from contributions by one or more public
employers.
(19) “Police officer” includes:
(a) Employees of institutions defined in ORS 421.005 as  Department of Corrections institutions
whose duties, as assigned by the  Director of the Department of Corrections, include the custody of
persons committed to  the custody of or transferred to the Department of Corrections and employees
of the Department of  Corrections who were classified as police officers on or before July 27, 1989,
whether or not such classification was authorized by law.
(b) Employees of the Department of State Police who are classified as  police officers , forensic
scientists or evidence technicians  by the Superintendent of State Police.
(c) Employees of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission who  are classified as regulatory
specialists by the administrator of the commission.
(d) Sheriffs and those deputy  sheriffs or other employees of a sheriff whose duties, as classified
by the sheriff, are the regular duties of police officers or corrections officers.
(e) Police chiefs and police personnel of a city who are classified as police officers by  the
council or other governing body of the city.
(f) Police officers who are commissioned by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125 and  who
are classified as police officers by the university.
(g) Parole and probation officers employed  by the Department of Corrections, parole and pro-
bation officers who are  transferred to county employment under ORS 423.549 and adult parole and
probation officers, as defined in  ORS 181A.355, who are classified as police officers for the purposes
of this chapter by  the county governing body. If a county classifies adult parole and probation offi-
cers as police officers for the purposes of this chapter, and the employees so classified are  repres-
ented by a labor organization,  any proposal by the county to change that classification or to cease
to classify adult parole and probation officers as police officers for the purposes of this  chapter is
a mandatory subject of bargaining.
(h) Police officers appointed under ORS 276.021 or 276.023.
(i) Employees of  the Port of Portland who are classified as airport police by the Board of Com-
missioners of the Port of Portland.
(j) Employees of the State Department of Agriculture who are classified as livestock  police of-
ficers by the Director of Agriculture.
(k) Employees of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training who are  classified by
the department as other than secretarial or clerical personnel.
(L) Investigators of the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice.
(m) Corrections officers as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(n) Employees of the Oregon State Lottery Commission who are classified by  the Director of the
Oregon State Lottery as enforcement agents pursuant to ORS 461.110.
(o) The Director of the Department of Corrections.
(p) An employee who for  seven consecutive years has been classified as a police officer as de-
fined by this section, and who is employed or transferred by the  Department of Corrections to fill
a position designated by the Director of the Department of Corrections as being  eligible for police
officer status.
(q) An employee of  the Department of Corrections classified as a police officer on or prior to
July 27, 1989, whether or not that classification was authorized by law, as long as  the employee
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 3
remains in the position held on July 27, 1989. The initial classification of an employee  under a sys-
tem implemented pursuant to ORS 240.190 does not affect police officer status.
(r) Employees of a school district  who are appointed and duly sworn members of a law
enforcement agency of the district as provided in ORS 332.531 or otherwise  employed full-time as
police officers commissioned by the district.
(s) Employees at  youth correction facilities and juvenile detention facilities under ORS 419A.050,
419A.052 and 420.005 to 420.915 who are required  to hold valid Oregon teaching licenses and who
have supervisory, control or teaching responsibilities over juveniles committed to the custody of  the
Department of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority.
(t) Employees at youth correction facilities as defined in ORS 420.005  whose primary job de-
scription involves the custody, control, treatment, investigation or  supervision of juveniles placed
in such facilities.
(u) Employees of the Oregon Youth Authority  who are classified as juvenile parole and pro-
bation officers.
(v) Employees of the Department of Human Services who are  prohibited from striking under
ORS 243.726 and whose duties include the  care of residents of residential facilities, as defined in
ORS 443.400, that house individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
(w) Employees appointed as judicial marshals under ORS 1.177 who are certified  under ORS
181A.540.
(x) Certified parole and probation officers employed by  the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision.
(y) District attorneys and  deputy district attorneys.
(20) “Prior service credit” means credit provided under  ORS 238.442 or under ORS 238.225 (2)
to (6) (1999 Edition).
(21) “Public employer” means the state,  one of its agencies or any city, county, municipal or
public corporation, political subdivision of the state  or instrumentality thereof, or an agency created
by one or more such governmental organizations to provide governmental services. For purposes of
this chapter, such agency created by one  or more governmental organizations is a governmental
instrumentality and a legal entity with power to enter into contracts, hold  property and sue and be
sued.
(22) “Qualifying position” means one or more jobs with one or more participating public  em-
ployers in which an employee performs 600 or more hours  of service in a full calendar year, or
would perform 600 or  more hours of service if the employee were employed for the full calendar
year, excluding any service in a job for which a participating public employer does not  provide
benefits under this chapter pursuant to an application made under ORS 238.035.
(23) “Regular account” means the account established for  each active and inactive member un-
der ORS 238.250.
(24) “Retired member” means a member who is retired for service or disability.
(25) “Retirement credit” means a period of time that  is treated as creditable service for the
purposes of this chapter.
(26)(a) “Salary” means  the remuneration paid an employee in cash out of the funds of a public
employer in return for services to the employer, plus the monetary value, as determined by the
Public Employees Retirement Board, of  whatever living quarters, board, lodging, fuel, laundry and
other advantages the employer furnishes the employee in return for services.
(b) “Salary” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Payments of employee and employer money into a deferred  compensation plan, which are
deemed salary paid in each month of deferral;
(B) The amount  of participation in a tax-sheltered or deferred annuity, which is deemed salary
paid in each month of participation;
(C) Retroactive payments described in ORS 238.008;
(D) Wages of a  deceased member paid to a surviving spouse or dependent children under ORS
652.190; and
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 4
(E) The full amount of  required employee contributions under ORS 238A.330 that are paid by the
employer on behalf of its employees under ORS 238A.335 (2)(b), solely for the purpose of  computing
a member’s final average salary, and not for any other purpose.
(c) “Salary” or “other advantages” does not include:
(A) Travel or any other expenses incidental to employer’s business which is  reimbursed by the
employer;
(B) Payments for insurance coverage by an employer on behalf of employee or employee and
dependents, for which the employee has no cash option;
(C) Payments made on account of an employee’s death;
(D) Any lump sum payment for accumulated unused sick leave;
(E) Any accelerated payment of an employment contract for a future period or an  advance
against future wages;
(F) Any  retirement incentive, retirement severance pay, retirement bonus or retirement
gratuitous payment;
(G) Payments for periods of leave of absence after the date the employer  and employee have
agreed that no future services qualifying pursuant to ORS  238.015 (3) will be performed, except for
sick leave and vacation;
(H) Payments for  instructional services rendered to public universities listed in ORS 352.002 or
the Oregon Health and Science University when such services are in excess of full-time employment
subject to this chapter. A person employed under a contract  for less than 12 months is subject to
this subparagraph only for the months to which the contract pertains;
(I) Payments made by an employer for insurance coverage provided to a domestic  partner of an
employee;
(J) Compensation described and  authorized under ORS 341.556 that is not paid by the community
college employing the faculty member;
(K) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 352.232 that is  not paid by the public
university employing the officer or employee;
(L) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 353.270 that is  not paid by Oregon
Health and Science University; or
(M) For years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, any  amount in excess of $195,000 for a
calendar year. If any period over which salary is determined is less than 12 months, the $195,000
limitation for that period shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the  number
of months in the determination period and the denominator of which is 12. On January 1 of each
year, the board shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this subparagraph to reflect any percentage
changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban  Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(27) “School year” means the period beginning July 1 and ending June 30 next following.
(28) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System.
(29) “Variable account” means the account established for a member who participates in  the
Variable Annuity Account under ORS 238.260.
(30) “Vested” means being an active member of the system in each of five calendar years.
(31) “Volunteer firefighter” means  a firefighter whose position normally requires less than 600
hours of service per year.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 238A.005 is amended to read:
238A.005. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active member” means a member of the pension program  or the individual account program
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan who is actively employed in a qualifying position.
(2) “Actuarial equivalent” means a payment  or series of payments having the same value as the
payment or series of payments replaced, computed  on the basis of interest rate and mortality as-
sumptions adopted by the board.
(3) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board.
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 5
(4) “Eligible employee” means a person who performs services for  a participating public em-
ployer, including persons  considered employees of a participating public employer under 26 U.S.C.
3121(d)(2), as in effect on January 1, 2023, and elected officials other than judges. “Eligible
employee” does not include:
(a) Persons engaged as independent contractors;
(b) Aliens working under a training or educational visa;
(c) Persons provided sheltered employment or make-work by a public employer;
(d) Persons categorized by a participating public employer as student employees;
(e) Any person who is in custody in a state institution;
(f) Employees of foreign trade offices  of the Oregon Business Development Department who live
and perform services in foreign countries under the provisions of ORS 285A.075 (1)(g);
(g) An employee actively participating in an alternative retirement program established  under
ORS 353.250 or an optional retirement plan established under ORS 341.551;
(h) Employees of a public university listed in  ORS 352.002 who are actively participating in an
optional retirement plan offered under ORS 243.815;
(i) Persons employed in positions classified as post-doctoral scholar  positions by a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or by the Oregon Health and Science University, under ORS 350.370;
(j) Any employee who belongs to a class of employees that was not eligible on August  28, 2003,
for membership in the system under the provisions of ORS chapter 238 or other law;
(k) Any person who belongs to a class of employees who are not  eligible to become members
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan under the provisions of ORS 238A.070 (2);
(L) Any person who is retired  under ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250 or ORS chapter 238 and who
continues to receive retirement benefits while employed; and
(m) Judges.
(5) “Firefighter” means:
(a) A person employed by a local government, as defined in ORS 174.116, whose  primary job
duties include the fighting of fires;
(b) The State Fire Marshal, chief deputy state fire marshals and deputy state fire marshals;
(c) An employee of the State Fire  Marshal whose primary duties include fire investigation, fire
prevention, fire safety, fire control or fire suppression;
(d) An employee of the State Forestry Department  who is certified by the State Forester as a
professional wildland firefighter and whose primary duties  include the abatement of uncontrolled
fires as described in ORS 477.064; and
(e) An employee of the Oregon Military Department whose primary duties  include fighting
structural, aircraft, wildland or other fires.
(6) “Fund” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(7)(a) “Hazardous position” means a position that does not meet the definition  of a
qualified public safety employee under section 72(t)(10)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, but
that:
(A) Requires the person holding the position to work with or manage emergency  or
traumatic events in the regular course of work; or
(B) Carries a high risk of physical harm.
(b) “Hazardous position” includes and is limited to:
(A) Employees of the Oregon State Hospital who have direct contact with patients; and
(B) Telecommunicators, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a) “Hour of service” means:
(A) An hour for which an eligible employee is directly or indirectly  paid or entitled to payment
by a participating public employer for performance of duties in a qualifying position; and
(B) An hour of vacation, holiday, illness, incapacity, jury duty, military duty or authorized  leave
during which an employee does not perform duties but for which the  employee is directly or indi-
rectly paid or entitled to payment  by a participating public employer for services in a qualifying
position, as long as the hour is within  the number of hours regularly scheduled for the performance
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 6
of duties during the period of vacation, holiday, illness, incapacity,  jury duty, military duty or au-
thorized leave.
(b) “Hour of service”  does not include any hour for which payment is made or due under a plan
maintained solely for the purpose of complying with applicable unemployment compensation laws.
[(8)] (9) “Inactive member” means a  member of the pension program or the individual account
program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan whose membership has  not been terminated,
who is not a retired member and who is not employed in a qualifying position.
[(9)] (10) “Individual account program”  means the defined contribution individual account pro-
gram of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan established under ORS 238A.025.
[(10)] (11) “Institution of higher education” means a  public university listed in ORS 352.002, the
Oregon Health and Science University or a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
[(11)] (12) “Member” means an eligible employee who has  established membership in the pension
program or the individual account  program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan and whose
membership has not been terminated under ORS 238A.110 or 238A.310.
[(12)] (13) “Participating public employer” means a public employer as  defined in ORS 238.005
that provides retirement benefits for employees of the public employer under the system.
[(13)] (14) “Pension program” means the defined benefit pension program of  the Oregon Public
Service Retirement Plan established under ORS 238A.025.
[(14)] (15) “Police officer” means a police officer as described in ORS 238.005.
[(15)] (16) “Qualifying  position” means one or more jobs with one or more participating public
employers in which an  eligible employee performs 600 or more hours of service in a full calendar
year, or would perform  600 or more hours of service if the employee were employed for the full
calendar year, excluding any service in a job for which benefits are not provided  under the Oregon
Public Service Retirement Plan pursuant to ORS 238A.070 (2).
[(16)] (17) “Retired member” means a pension program member who is receiving  a pension as
provided in ORS 238A.180 to 238A.195.
[(17)(a)] (18)(a) “Salary” means the remuneration paid to  an active member in return for ser-
vices to the participating public employer, including remuneration in the form of living quarters,
board or other items of value, to the extent the  remuneration is, or would be if the member were
an Oregon resident, includable in  the employee’s taxable income under Oregon law. “Salary” in-
cludes the additional amounts specified in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, but does not include the
amounts specified in paragraph (c) of this  subsection, regardless of whether those amounts are
includable in taxable income.
(b) “Salary” includes the following amounts:
(A) Payments of employee and employer money into a deferred compensation  plan that are made
at the election of the employee.
(B) Contributions to a tax-sheltered or deferred annuity that are made at the election of the
employee.
(C) Any amount that is contributed to a cafeteria  plan or qualified transportation fringe benefit
plan by the employer at the election of the employee  and that is not includable in the taxable in-
come of the employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. 125 or 132(f)(4), as in effect on December 31, 2022.
(D) Any amount that is contributed to a cash or deferred arrangement by the employer  at the
election of the employee and that is not included in the taxable income of  the employee by reason
of 26 U.S.C. 402(e)(3), as in effect on December 31, 2022.
(E) Retroactive payments described in ORS 238.008.
(F) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account program that is paid by
the employer and deducted from the compensation of the employee, as provided  under ORS 238A.335
(1) and (2)(a).
(G) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account program that is  not paid
by the employer under ORS 238A.335.
(H) Wages of  a deceased member paid to a surviving spouse or dependent children under ORS
652.190.
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 7
(c) “Salary” does not include the following amounts:
(A) Travel or any other expenses incidental to employer’s business which is  reimbursed by the
employer.
(B) Payments made on account of an employee’s death.
(C) Any lump sum payment  for accumulated unused sick leave, vacation leave or other paid
leave.
(D) Any severance payment,  accelerated payment of an employment contract for a future period
or advance against future wages.
(E) Any retirement incentive, retirement bonus or retirement gratuitous payment.
(F) Payment for a leave of absence  after the date the employer and employee have agreed that
no future services in a qualifying position will be performed.
(G) Payments for instructional services rendered to public universities listed in  ORS 352.002 or
the Oregon Health and  Science University when those services are in excess of full-time employment
subject to this chapter. A person employed under a  contract for less than 12 months is subject to
this subparagraph only for the months covered by the contract.
(H) The amount of an employee  contribution to the individual account program that is paid by
the employer and is not deducted from the compensation of the employee, as  provided under ORS
238A.335 (1) and (2)(b).
(I) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 341.556 that  is not paid by the community
college employing the faculty member.
(J) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 352.232 that is not paid  by the public
university employing the officer or employee.
(K) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 353.270 that is not paid by Oregon
Health and Science University.
(L) For years before 2020, any amount in excess of $200,000 for a calendar year. If  any period
over which salary is determined is less than 12 months,  the $200,000 limitation for that period shall
be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is  the number of months in the determination
period and the denominator of which  is 12. The board shall adopt rules adjusting this dollar limit
to incorporate cost-of-living adjustments authorized by the Internal Revenue Service.
(M) For years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, any  amount in excess of $195,000 for a
calendar year. If any period over which salary is determined is less than 12 months, the $195,000
limitation for that period shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the  number
of months in the determination period and the denominator of which is 12. On January 1 of each
year, the board shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this subparagraph to reflect any percentage
changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban  Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[(18)] (19) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System.
[(19)] (20) “Workers’ compensation benefits” means:
(a) Payments made under ORS chapter 656; or
(b) Payments provided in lieu of workers’ compensation benefits under ORS 656.027 (6).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 238A.125 is amended to read:
238A.125. (1) Upon retiring at normal retirement age, a vested pension program member  shall
be paid an annual pension for the life of the member as follows:
(a) For  service as a police officer or firefighter, 1.8 percent of final average salary multiplied
by the number of years of retirement credit attributable to service as a  police officer or firefighter.
(b) For service in a hazardous position, 1.8 percent of final average salary multiplied by
the number of years of retirement credit attributable to service in a hazardous position.
[(b)] (c) For  service as other than a police officer or firefighter  or in a hazardous position , 1.5
percent of final average salary  multiplied by the number of years of retirement credit attributable
to service as other than a police officer or firefighter  or in a hazardous position .
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS 238A.100  to 238A.250, the annual benefit payable to
a member under the pension program and under  any other tax-qualified defined benefit plan main-
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 8
tained by  the participating public employer may not exceed the applicable limitations set forth in
26 U.S.C. 415(b), as in effect on December 31,  2022. The Public Employees Retirement Board shall
adopt rules for the administration of this limitation, including adjustments in the annual dollar lim-
itation to reflect cost-of-living adjustments authorized by the Internal Revenue Service.
(3) The board shall make  no actuarial adjustment in a member’s pension calculated under this
section by reason of the member’s retirement after normal retirement age.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 238A.160 is amended to read:
238A.160. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,  normal retirement age
for a member of the pension program is the earlier of:
(a) 65 years of age; or
(b) 58 years of age if the member has 30 years or more of retirement credit.
(2)(a) Normal retirement age for a  member of the pension program who retires from service as
a police officer or firefighter, and whose last 60 months of retirement credit  preceding retirement
eligibility under this  section is classified as retirement credit for service as a police officer or a
firefighter, is the earlier of:
(A) [ 60] 55 years of age; or
(B) 53 years of age if the member has 25 years or more of retirement credit.
(b) A member who  establishes retirement eligibility under this subsection retains retirement el-
igibility  as  a police officer or firefighter, even if the member performs service thereafter only as
other than a police officer or firefighter.
(c) A period of leave from a position as a police officer  or firefighter for which a member is
entitled to retirement credit for service as a police officer or firefighter and which is part  of the
member’s last 60 months of retirement  credit preceding retirement eligibility under this section shall
be counted as part of the last 60 months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under
this section.
(d) Retirement credit for a month in which a member performs service as both a police  officer
or firefighter and as other than  a police officer or firefighter shall be classified as retirement credit
for service as a police officer or firefighter for purposes of this section.
(e) A  member employed as a police officer or firefighter is not required to restart the last 60
months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under this section when the member:
(A) Is on unpaid leave from  the member’s position as a police officer or firefighter and is re-
ceiving insurance payments for short-term or long-term disability for which retirement credit is not
available under ORS 238A.155; and
(B) Is concurrently employed and performing service as other  than a police officer or firefighter.
(3) Normal retirement age for a member of the pension program who retires from service as  a
school employee as defined by ORS 238A.140 is the earlier of:
(a) 65 years of age; or
(b) 58 years of age if the member has been an active member in 30 or more calendar years.
(4) The  normal retirement date of a member is the first day of the month beginning on or after
the date the member reaches normal retirement age.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 238A.160, as amended by section 4 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
238A.160. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2)  [ and (3) ] to (4)  of this section, normal re-
tirement age for a member of the pension program is the earlier of:
(a) 65 years of age; or
(b) 58 years of age if the member has 30 years or more of retirement credit.
(2)(a) Normal retirement age for a member of the pension program  who retires from service as
a police officer  or firefighter, and whose last 60 months of retirement credit preceding retirement
eligibility under this section is classified as retirement credit for service as a police officer  or a
firefighter, is the earlier of:
(A) 55 years of age; or
(B) 53 years of age if the member has 25 years or more of retirement credit.
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 9
(b) A member who establishes retirement eligibility under this subsection  retains retirement el-
igibility as a police officer or firefighter, even if the member performs service thereafter only  as
other than a police officer or firefighter.
(c) A period of leave from a position as a police officer  or firefighter for which a member is
entitled to retirement credit for service as a police officer or firefighter and which is part  of the
member’s last 60 months of retirement  credit preceding retirement eligibility under this section shall
be counted as part of the last 60 months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under
this section.
(d) Retirement credit for a month in which a member performs service as both a police  officer
or firefighter and as other than  a police officer or firefighter shall be classified as retirement credit
for service as a police officer or firefighter for purposes of this section.
(e) A  member employed as a police officer or firefighter is not required to restart the last 60
months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under this section when the member:
(A) Is on unpaid leave from  the member’s position as a police officer or firefighter and is re-
ceiving insurance payments for short-term or long-term disability for which retirement credit is not
available under ORS 238A.155; and
(B) Is concurrently employed and performing service as other  than a police officer or firefighter.
(3)(a) Normal retirement age for a member of the pension  program who retires from
service as a person in a hazardous  position, and whose last 60 months of retirement credit
preceding retirement eligibility under this section  is classified as retirement credit for ser-
vice in a hazardous position, is the earlier of:
(A) 60 years of age; or
(B) 58 years of age if the member has 25 or more years of retirement credit.
(b) A member who establishes retirement eligibility under this subsection retains retire-
ment eligibility as a person serving in a hazardous position, even if the member  performs
service thereafter only in other than a hazardous position.
(c) A period of leave from a hazardous position for which a  member is entitled to re-
tirement credit for  service in a hazardous position and which is part of the member’s last
60 months of retirement credit preceding retirement eligibility  under this section shall be
counted as part of the last 60 months of retirement credit required  for retirement eligibility
under this section.
(d) Retirement credit for a month in which a member  performs service both in a haz-
ardous position and in other than a hazardous position shall be classified as retirement credit
for service in a hazardous position for purposes of this section.
(e) A member  employed in a hazardous position is not required to restart the last 60
months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under this section  when the
member:
(A) Is on unpaid leave from the member’s hazardous  position and is receiving insurance
payments for short-term or long-term disability for  which retirement credit is not available
under ORS 238A.155; and
(B) Is concurrently employed and performing service in  other than a hazardous position.
[(3)] (4) Normal retirement age for a member of the pension program who  retires from service
as a school employee as defined by ORS 238A.140 is the earlier of:
(a) 65 years of age; or
(b) 58 years of age if the member has been an active member in 30 or more calendar years.
[(4)] (5) The normal retirement date of a member is the  first day of the month beginning on or
after the date the member reaches normal retirement age.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 238A.220 is amended to read:
238A.220. (1) A participating public employer shall make employer contributions to the Public
Employees Retirement Board at intervals designated by the board in the amounts determined by the
board under ORS 238.225. All participating public employers shall  be considered to be a single em-
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 10
ployer for the purposes of the employer contributions under ORS 238.225  that are required for
funding the pension program established under ORS 238A.025.
(2) For the  purpose of the actuarial computation required under ORS 238.225, the board shall
separately establish the liability  of participating public employers for police officers and firefighters
under the pension  program and shall require that public employers that employ police officers and
firefighters who are members of the pension program make contributions  for those employees based
on the liability established under this subsection.
(3) For  the purpose of the actuarial computation required under ORS 238.225, the board
shall separately establish the  liability of participating public employers for members in haz-
ardous positions under the pension program  and shall require that public employers that
employ members in hazardous positions who are members of the pension program  make
contributions for those employees based on the liability established under this subsection.
SECTION 7.  ORS 238A.240 is amended to read:
238A.240. (1) A participating public employer shall contribute  to the pension program, at inter-
vals designated by the Public Employees Retirement Board, all  amounts determined by the board to
be actuarially necessary to  adequately fund the disability benefits to be provided under ORS
238A.235 and the reasonable costs of administering the provision  of those benefits. The board shall
periodically determine the liabilities  attributable to the disability benefits and shall set the amount
of contributions to be made by participating public  employers, and by other public employers who
are required to make  contributions on behalf of members, to ensure that those liabilities will be
funded no more than 40 years after the  date on which the determination is made. All participating
public employers shall  be considered to be a single employer for the purposes of the contributions
required under this section.
(2) For the purpose of the  actuarial computation required under subsection (1) of this section,
the board shall separately establish the liability of  participating public employers for police officers
and firefighters, and shall  require that public employers that employ police officers and firefighters
make contributions for those employees based on the liability established under this section.
(3) For the purpose of the actuarial computation required under subsection  (1) of this
section, the board shall separately establish the liability of participating public employers for
members in hazardous positions, and shall require that public employers that  employ mem-
bers in hazardous positions make  contributions for those employees based on the liability
established under this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 238A.134 is amended to read:
238A.134. For purposes of determining the salary, as defined in ORS 238A.005 [ (17)] (18), of  an
active  member  of the Public Employees Retirement System, a housing allowance paid to a member
in return for services as a prison chaplain shall be treated as if it were includable in the  member’s
taxable income under Oregon law.
SECTION 9.  ORS 338.135 is amended to read:
338.135. (1) Employee assignment to a public charter school shall be voluntary.
(2)(a) A public charter school or  the sponsor of the public charter school is considered the em-
ployer of any employees of the public charter school.  If a school district board is not the sponsor
of the public charter school, the school district board may not be the employer of the employees of
the public charter  school and the school district board may not collectively bargain with the em-
ployees of the public charter school. The public  charter school governing body shall control the
selection of employees at the public charter school.
(b) If a virtual public charter school or the sponsor of a virtual public  charter school contracts
with a for-profit entity to provide educational services through the  virtual public charter school, the
for-profit entity may not be the employer of any employees of the  virtual public charter school un-
less:
(A) The employee is an administrator who does not have any teaching responsibilities; and
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 11
(B) Both the  executive officer of the sponsor and the public charter school governing body ap-
prove employment by the for-profit entity. The executive officer or governing body may  choose to
grant approval under this subparagraph:
(i) For all employees of the  for-profit entity who meet the description in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph;
(ii) Based on the job categories of the employees who meet the description in subparagraph  (A)
of this paragraph; or
(iii) On a case-by-case basis for each  employee who meets the description in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph.
(3) The school district board of the school district within which the public charter school is  lo-
cated shall grant a leave of absence to any  employee who chooses to work in the public charter
school. The length and terms of the leave of  absence shall be set by negotiated agreement or by
board policy. However, the length of the leave of absence may not be less than two years unless:
(a) The charter  of the public charter school is terminated or the public charter school is dis-
solved or closed during the leave of absence; or
(b) The employee and  the school district board have mutually agreed to a different length of
time.
(4) An employee of a public charter school operating within a school district who  is granted a
leave of absence from the school district and returns  to employment with the school district shall
retain seniority and  benefits as an employee pursuant to the terms of the leave of absence.
Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 to 243.809, a school district that was the  employer of an employee of
a public charter school not operating within the school district may make provisions for  the return
of the employee to employment with the school district.
(5)(a) For purposes  of ORS chapters 238 and 238A, a public charter school shall be considered
a public employer and as such shall participate in the Public Employees Retirement System.
(b) For purposes of determining the salary paid to an active member of the Public Employees
Retirement System under ORS 238A.005 [ (17)] (18) during the period between August 29, 2003, and
January 1, 2020, remuneration paid to a member in return for services  to a public charter school is
deemed includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during a  period of continuous
employment with any public charter school if:
(A) The member was hired in a qualifying  position by any public charter school on or after
August 29, 2003;
(B) The member  was informed in writing by the public charter school during the period of con-
tinuous employment that the member was eligible to participate in the  Public Employees Retirement
System and the public charter school made contributions to the system on the member’s behalf;
(C) The remuneration was, or would have been if the member were  an Oregon resident,
includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during the period of  continuous em-
ployment; and
(D) The member resided and performed services in the United States during the period of con-
tinuous employment.
(c) As  used in this subsection, “continuous employment” means employment with a public char-
ter school that is not interrupted by a period of more than 30 consecutive calendar days.
(6) For teacher licensing, employment experience in public charter schools  shall be considered
equivalent to experience in public schools.
(7)(a) Any  person employed as an administrator in a public charter school shall be licensed or
registered to administer by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(b) Any person employed as a teacher in a public charter school shall be licensed or  registered
to teach by the commission.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, at least one-half  of the total full-time
equivalent (FTE) teaching and administrative staff at the public charter school shall be licensed by
the commission pursuant to ORS 342.125.
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 12
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650, a  public charter school shall be considered a school district
for purposes of ORS 243.650 to 243.809. An employee  of a public charter school may be a member
of a labor organization or organize  with other employees to bargain collectively. Bargaining units
at the public charter school may be  separate from other bargaining units of the sponsor or of the
school district in which  the public charter school is located. Employees of a public charter school
may be part of the bargaining units of the sponsor or of the  school district in which the public
charter school is located.
(9) An entity described in ORS 338.005 (4)  may not waive the right to sponsor a public charter
school in a collective bargaining agreement.
SECTION 10.  ORS 352.138 is amended to read:
352.138. (1) The following entities are not  subject to any provision of law enacted after January
1, 2013, that is unique to governmental entities unless the following entities are expressly named:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b) Any not-for-profit organization or other entity if the equity of the  entity is owned or con-
trolled  exclusively  by a public university and if the organization or entity is created by the univer-
sity to advance any of the university’s statutory missions.
(2) Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section and ORS 352.033, the provisions of ORS 30.260
to 30.460, 33.710, 33.720, 200.005 to 200.025, 200.045  to 200.090, 236.605 to 236.640, 279.835, 279.840,
279.850 and 297.040 and ORS chapters 35, 190, 192  and 244 apply to a public university listed in ORS
352.002 under the same terms as they apply to public bodies other than the state.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of ORS 35.550 to 35.575, 180.060,  180.210
to 180.235, 184.305 to 184.345, 190.480, 190.490,  200.035, 243.696, 357.805 to 357.895 and 656.017 (2)
and ORS chapters 182, 183, 240, 270, 273, 276, 278, 279A, 279B, 279C, 282, 283, 291, 292, 293, 294,  295
and 297 do not apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this  section and ORS 352.033, ORS 240.167,
279C.600 to 279C.625, 279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.825, 279C.827, 279C.830, 279C.835, 279C.836, 279C.838,
279C.840, 279C.845, 279C.850, 279C.855, 279C.860, 279C.865, 279C.870 and 292.043 apply to a public
university listed in ORS 352.002  under the same terms as they apply to public bodies other than the
state.
(b) Notwithstanding subsections (1)  and (3) of this section, ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 apply to
an agreement under the  terms of which a private entity constructs, reconstructs, renovates or paints
an improvement on real property owned by a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or  by a not-
for-profit organization or other entity that a public university owns or controls exclusively.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, ORS  190.430 and 192.105 do not apply to a
public university listed in ORS 352.002 or any organization or other entity described in subsection
(1) of this section.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, except as  set forth in subsection (3) of this section, ORS
243.650 to 243.809 and 276.073 to 276.090 and  ORS chapters 238 and 238A apply to a public univer-
sity listed in ORS 352.002 under the same terms as they apply to the state.
(b) For purposes of determining the salary of an active member of the Public  Employees Re-
tirement System under ORS 238A.005 [ (17)] (18), remuneration paid to a member in return for ser-
vices to a public university listed in ORS 352.002 is deemed includable in the member’s  taxable
income under Oregon law during a period  of continuous employment with any public university
listed in ORS 352.002 if:
(A) The member was hired in a qualifying position by a public  university listed in ORS 352.002
on or after August 29, 2003, and on or before December 31, 2016; and
(B) The member  resided and performed services in the United States during the period of con-
tinuous employment.
(7) ORS 350.285, 350.290, 352.198, 352.226, 352.232, 352.293, 352.296, 352.303, 352.309 and 352.313
apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, a public university listed in ORS 352.002  and its agents and
employees remain subject to all statutes  and administrative rules of this state that create rights,
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 13
benefits or  protections in favor of military veterans, service members and families of service mem-
bers to the same extent as an agency of this state would be  subject to such statutes and adminis-
trative rules.
(9) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033,  ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550 apply to a public university
listed in ORS 352.002. A public university may not issue a tax credit  certificate under ORS 350.540,
350.545 and 350.550 that will cause the General Fund to be owed more than $8.4  million at any one
time under ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550.
(10) If state bonds are issued  for the benefit of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 under
Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution:
(a) The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall have the powers and duties of a
project agency, as defined in ORS 286A.816, to the extent necessary for the issuance  of the state
bonds and the administration of the proceeds of the state bonds; and
(b) The university and  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall enter into grant
contracts or loan agreements that comply with rules  adopted by the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services relating to:
(A) Disbursement of project funds by a project agency through grant contracts or  loan agree-
ments;
(B) Submission of a request for project funds to the commission under ORS 350.095; and
(C) Any other matters determined by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services to be
necessary for the administration of the Article XI-Q bond program.
(11) Nothing in  this section may be construed so that statutory provisions that are not set forth
in this section apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 353.100 is amended to read:
353.100. (1) The provisions  of ORS chapters 35, 190, 192, 244 and 295 and ORS 30.260 to 30.460,
200.005 to 200.025, 200.045 to 200.090, 236.605 to  236.640, 243.650 to 243.809, 297.040, 307.090 and
307.112 apply to  Oregon Health and Science University under the same terms as they apply to public
bodies other than the state.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of ORS chapters 182,  183, 240, 270, 273,
276, 279A, 279B, 279C, 283, 291, 292, 293,  294 and 297 and ORS 35.550 to 35.575, 180.060, 180.210 to
180.235, 183.710 to 183.730, 183.745, 183.750, 184.305 to 184.345, 190.430, 190.480, 190.490,  192.105,
200.035, 243.105 to 243.585, 243.696, 243.853 to 243.855, 278.011 to 278.120, 278.315 to 278.415, 279.835
to 279.855, 282.010 to 282.150, 283.085 to 283.092, 357.805 to 357.895  and 656.017 (2) do not apply to
the university or any not-for-profit organization or other entity  if the equity of the entity is owned
exclusively by the university and if the organization or  entity is created by the university to ad-
vance any of the university’s statutory missions.
(3) The university, as a distinct governmental entity, or any organization or entity described in
subsection (2) of this section is not subject to any provision  of law enacted after January 1, 1995,
with respect to any governmental entity,  unless the provision specifically provides that it applies to
the university or to the organization or entity.
(4) For purposes of determining the salary, as defined in ORS 238A.005  [(17)] (18), paid between
August 29, 2003, and January 1, 2020, to a member of  the Public Employees Retirement System,
remuneration paid to a member of the system in return  for services to the university is deemed
includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during a period of continuous  em-
ployment with the Oregon Health and Science University if:
(a) The member was hired in a qualifying  position, as defined in ORS 238A.005, by the university
on or after August 29, 2003; and
(b) The remuneration was, or would have  been if the member were an Oregon resident,
includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during the period of  continuous em-
ployment.
SECTION 12. The Public Employees Retirement Board shall study  the likely liability of
participating public employers for members in hazardous positions, as  defined in ORS
238A.005, as amended by section 2 of this 2024 Act. The board shall submit a report in the
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 14
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and shall include  recommendations for implementation of
benefits for members working in hazardous positions,  to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to public employee retirement no later  than September 15, 2028.
SECTION 13. (1) Section 12 of this 2024 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2027.
(2) Section 12 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 14.
The Public Employees Retirement Board shall report  at each odd-numbered
year regular session, in writing or in person, to  a committee of the Legislative Assembly
related to public employee retirement on  progress toward implementing the amendments to
ORS 238A.005, 238A.125, 238A.134, 238A.160, 238A.220, 238A.240, 338.135, 352.138 and 353.100 by
sections 2, 3 and 5  to 11 of this 2024 Act. The report must include the impact of any delays
occurring as a result of other ongoing projects of the board.
SECTION 15. Section 14 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 16. (1) The amendments to  ORS 238.005 by section 1 of this 2024 Act apply only
to a person who:
(a) Is employed  as a district attorney, or as a forensic scientist or evidence technician
by the Department of State Police, on the effective date of this 2024 Act; or
(b) Becomes employed as a district attorney, or as a forensic  scientist or evidence tech-
nician by the Department of State Police, after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
(2) A person who is employed as a district attorney, or as a  forensic scientist or evidence
technician by the Department of  State Police, on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act
is entitled to service under the Public Employees Retirement System as a  police officer only
for service performed as  a district attorney, or as a forensic scientist or evidence technician
for the Department of State Police, on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 17. The amendments to ORS 238A.160 by section 4  of this 2024 Act apply to
members of  the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan whose effective date of retirement
is on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 18. (1) The amendments to ORS 238A.005, 238A.125, 238A.134,  238A.160,
238A.220, 238A.240, 338.135, 352.138 and 353.100 by  sections 2, 3 and 5 to 11 of this 2024 Act
become operative on January 1, 2030.
(2) The amendments to ORS 238A.125 by section 3 of this 2024 Act apply only to service
in a hazardous position performed on  or after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) A member is of normal retirement age for purposes of ORS 238A.160 (3),  as amended
by section 5 of this 2024 Act,  if the member, on or after the operative date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section:
(a) Meets the age or age and retirement credit requirements of ORS 238A.160 (3);
(b) Was last employed in a qualifying position that is a hazardous position; and
(c) Has accrued their last 60 months of retirement credit in one or more  positions that
qualify or would qualify as hazardous positions, as defined  in ORS 238A.005, as amended by
section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(4) Any member who would have established retirement  eligibility under ORS 238A.160
(3), had the amendments to ORS  238A.160 (3) by section 5 of this 2024 Act become operative
on January 1, 2019, is eligible to retire under ORS 238A.130 (3) on and  after January 1, 2030.
Service before January 1, 2019, may not be used  to establish retirement eligibility under this
subsection.
(5) The Public Employees Retirement Board may take  any action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section to enable the board to exercise,  on and after
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the board by the amendments to ORS 238A.005,  238A.125, 238A.134,
238A.160, 238A.220, 238A.240, 338.135, 352.138 and 353.100 by sections 2, 3 and 5 to 11 of this
2024 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 15
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (1), chapter 457, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Employees  Retirement System, for the Central
Administration Division, is increased by  $316,153, for the implementation of the amendments
to ORS 238.005 and 238A.160 by sections 1 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (3), chapter 457, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Information
Services Division, is increased by $540,624, for the implementation of the amendments to ORS
238.005 and 238A.160 by sections 1 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 21.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (4), chapter 457, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the Operations
Division, is increased by $1,180,755,  for the implementation of the amendments to ORS
238.005 and 238A.160 by sections 1 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-B) Page 16